Hawaii statutes.
§185-6 Insurance protection. All
persons who have performed services required under this chapter, which services
are made compensable under the terms of this chapter, shall, in case of injury
or death arising out of and in the performance of the functions pursuant to
this chapter, or their dependents, be entitled to all of the benefits provided
in chapter 386 including medical services and supplies; provided that for the
purposes of such benefits, average weekly wages shall be computed on the basis
of earnings from the usual employment of such persons. The cost thereof shall
be a charge upon the appropriate fund. [L 1953, c 100, §8; RL 1955, §19-56; HRS
§185-6; am L 1974, c 64, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next